California statutes. Public Resources Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4135.

Sections 4129 to 4135, inclusive, do not deprive the department of the power and duty to require that the money paid by the department under the contract to a county shall be expended by the county for fire prevention and suppression in that area the protection of which is assumed by the county pursuant to Section 4129.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4136.

(a) A transferor of real property that is located within a state responsibility area determined by the board, pursuant to Section 4125, shall disclose to a prospective transferee the fact that the property is located within a wildland area that may contain substantial forest fire risks and hazards and is subject to the requirements of Section 4291.

(b) Except for property located within a county that has assumed responsibility for prevention and suppression of all fires pursuant to Section 4129, the transferor shall also disclose to a prospective transferee that it is not the state’s responsibility to provide fire protection services to a
 building or structure located within the wildlands unless the department has entered into a cooperative agreement with a local agency for those purposes pursuant to Section 4142.

(c) Disclosure is required pursuant to this section only when one of the following conditions is met:

(1) The transferor, or the transferor’s agent, has actual knowledge that the property is within a wildland fire zone.

(2) A map that includes the property has been provided to the city or county pursuant to Section 4125, and a notice has been posted at the offices of the county recorder, county assessor, and county planning agency that identifies the location of the map and any information regarding changes to the map received by the county.

(d) In all transactions that are subject to Section 1103 of the Civil Code, the disclosures required by this section shall be provided by either of the following means:

(1) The Local Option Real Estate Disclosure Statement as provided in Section 1102.6a of the Civil Code.

(2) The Natural Hazard Disclosure Statement as provided in Section 1103.2 of the Civil Code.

(e) If the map or accompanying information is not of sufficient accuracy or scale that a reasonable person can determine if the subject real property is included in a wildland fire zone, the agent shall mark “Yes” on the Natural Hazard Disclosure Statement. The agent may mark “No” on the Natural Hazard
 Disclosure Statement if the agent attaches a report prepared pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1103.4 of the Civil Code that verifies the property is not in the hazard zone. This subdivision does not limit or abridge any existing duty of the transferor or the transferor’s agents to exercise reasonable care in making a determination under this subdivision.

(f) For purposes of this section, Section 1103.13 of the Civil Code applies.

(g) The specification of items for disclosure in this section does not limit or abridge any obligation for disclosure created by any other law or that may exist in order to avoid fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit in the transfer transaction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 51.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4137.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms apply:

(1) “Activities” means the specific actions performed to support a treatment, including, but not limited to, mechanical fuel reduction, hand fuel reduction, prescribed fire, or any other appropriate activities.

(2) “Fire
 prevention efforts” include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Fire prevention education.

(B) Hazardous fuel reduction and vegetation management treatments and activities.

(C) Fire investigation.

(D) Civil cost recovery.

(E) Forest and fire law enforcement.

(F) Fire prevention engineering.

(G) Prefire planning.

(H) Risk analysis.

(I) Volunteer programs and partnerships.

(3) “Participating in wildfire resilience activities” means dedicating an average of at least 15 percent of working hours, but less than 75 percent of working hours, to wildfire resilience-related activities.

(4) “Primarily focused on
 wildfire resilience activities” means dedicating an average of at least 75 percent of working hours to wildfire resilience-related activities.

(5) “Treatment” means actions conducted on the ground to meet a management objective, including, but not limited to, installation and maintenance of fuel breaks, fuels reduction, roadside fuels reduction, forest thinning, prescribed fire, reforestation, timber harvesting, fuel treatments in the wildland-urban interface, dead fuel removal, and all other treatments that reasonably could be considered fuels reduction or vegetation management.

(6) “Unique” means nonduplicated for the reporting year and, where multiple years are reported, across all of the years reported.

(7) “Wildfire resilience activities” include, but are not limited to, defensible space inspections and the
 activities identified in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (2).

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the year-round staffing and the
 shift to a 66-hour workweek that have been provided to the department pursuant to memorandums of understanding with the state will result in significant increases in the department’s current level of fire prevention and wildfire resilience activities. It is also the intent of the Legislature that the budgetary augmentations for year-round staffing not reduce the reimbursements that the department receives from contracts with local governments for the department to provide local fire protection and emergency services pursuant to Section 4144, commonly referred to as “Amador agreements.”

(c) On or before
 March 1 of each year, the department shall provide a report to the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, the Assembly Committee on Budget, the Senate Committee on Natural Resources and Water, the Assembly Committee on Natural Resources, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office, in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, detailing the department’s fire prevention efforts, including the increased activities described in subdivision (b). The report shall
 display the fire prevention efforts of the previous fiscal year, as well as the information from
 each of the prior two reporting years for purposes of a comparison of data. The report shall include, but not be limited to, by department administrative unit and statewide total, all of the following:

(1) Fire prevention efforts performed by the department on lands designated as state responsibility
 areas.
 The fire prevention efforts included in the report pursuant to this paragraph shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) The number of hours department personnel spent primarily focused on wildfire resilience activities, by activity, the number of hours department personnel spent participating in wildfire resilience activities, by activity, and the number of hours spent on emergency incident response, by type.

(B) The number of
 department personnel by classification that are (i) primarily focused on wildfire resilience activities and (ii) participating in wildfire resilience activities.

(C) The number of citations issued for noncompliance with Section 4291.

(D) The number of unique parcels inspected by department personnel for
 compliance with defensible space requirements.

(E) The number of unique parcels that are eligible to be inspected by department personnel for compliance with defensible space requirements.

(F) The total number of defensible space inspections conducted by department personnel.

(G) (i) The number of geographical acres treated by department personnel to improve wildfire resilience that are not defensible space inspections. No treated acre shall be counted more than one time per report period.

(ii) The number of geographical acres treated by department personnel, by treatment type, to improve wildfire resilience that are not
 defensible space inspections.

(H) The total number of acres treated by department personnel, by activity, to improve wildfire resilience.

(I) The funding sources and estimated amounts for the fire prevention efforts described in this
 subdivision,
 itemized by the activity categories described in subparagraphs (A) to (H), inclusive.

(J) Any other data or qualitative information deemed necessary by the department in order to provide the Legislature with a clear and accurate accounting of fire prevention efforts,
 particularly with regard to variations from one year to the next. The department may include recommendations for updating the reporting requirements in this section to reflect changes in science and best practices related to the tracking and monitoring of fire prevention efforts.

(2) Fire prevention efforts performed by counties, pursuant to
 Sections 4129 and 4132, that shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) The number of hours of fire prevention education performed.

(B) The number of defensible space inspections conducted by county.

(C) The number of citations issued for noncompliance with Section 4291.

(D) The number of acres treated by mechanical fuel reduction.

(E) The number of acres treated by prescribed burns.

(F) Any other data or qualitative information deemed necessary by the department in order to provide the Legislature
 with a clear and accurate accounting of fire prevention efforts, particularly with regard to variations from one year to the next.

(3) Projected fire prevention
 efforts for the following fiscal year.

(4) Information on each of the “Amador contracts” described in subdivision (b), including an annual update on the number of those contracts and reimbursements received from the contracts that are in effect.

(d) Wildfire resilience activities that are not conducted by department personnel shall not be included in the data required to be reported in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c). Defensible space inspections shall not be included in the data reported in subparagraphs (G) and (H) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c). The department shall define the scope of each treatment type that data is reported on in subparagraph (G) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) and each activity that data is reported on in subparagraph (H)
 of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(e) The report required by this section shall also include estimates of the portion of the amounts identified in subdivision (c) that result from the shift to a 66-hour workweek at the department, as well as a description of the methodology used to prepare these estimates.

(f) The data reported pursuant to subparagraphs (C) to (H), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), and subparagraphs (B) to (E), inclusive, of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), shall be displayed geographically and shall be available on the Wildfire and Forest Resilience Task Force’s internet website.

(g) Information contained in the report required by this section may be incorporated by reference, as applicable, to comply with annual legislative reporting required pursuant to Section 4771 of this code
 and Section 12805.9 of the Government Code.

(h) The department shall post on its internet website on or before December 31, 2023, and annually thereafter, all of the following information regarding hazardous fuel reduction and vegetation management projects funded or conducted by the department, including, but not limited to, projects funded under the department’s Forest Health Program, California Forest Improvement Program, and Wildfire Prevention Grants Program, as well as funding for CAL FIRE unit wildfire prevention projects and prescribed fire and
 hand crews, for the preceding fiscal year, beginning with funding included in the 2022–23 fiscal year:

(1) What permitting mechanism was used for each project.

(2) How the collaboration with the Department of Fish and Wildlife and the State Water Resources Control Board, as required by Section 4123, was achieved for both agencies, including whether the agency reviewed the project grant proposal or project description or permit.

(3) A description of any maintenance plan or other mechanism, if available, that is in place to support maintenance of vegetation improvements over time.

(4) A description of any mitigation required for each project, and whether the mitigation has been completed.

(i) On or before December 31, 2022, the department shall develop a standardized protocol for monitoring implementation and evaluating the positive and negative ecological and fire behavior impacts from vegetation management projects undertaken by the state, consistent with the requirements of Chapter 387 of the Statutes of 2021.

(j) The department shall provide links to all documents relevant to subdivisions
 (h) and
 (i) on its internet website.

(k) The reporting and monitoring requirements in subdivisions (h) and (i) shall be expanded to other state agencies that undertake or fund hazardous fuel reduction and vegetation management projects by December 31,
 2024, including, but not limited to, projects funded or conducted by state conservancies, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, or the Department of Parks and Recreation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 72, Sec. 35.   (SB 156)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Cooperative Agreements [4141. - 4145.]

4141.

(a) The department may, for the prevention and suppression of forest fires, enter into cooperative agreements with any person, firm, association, or corporation that owns or controls any forest, brush, grass, or grain lands, under such terms as the department deems advisable, and may renew, revise, or terminate these agreements.

 (b) The department also may, for the purpose of maintaining a fire patrol system, including staffing and facilities for the prevention and suppression of forest fires in any timber, brush, grass, or other flammable vegetation or material, enter into cooperative agreements and special use permits with the federal government, under those terms as it deems
 advisable, and may renew, revise, or terminate these agreements.

 (c) The expenses incurred under the agreements or permits entered into pursuant to this section shall be paid from appropriations or funds available for forest fire protection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 306, Sec. 6.   (AB 2544)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4142.

(a) The department, with the approval of the Department of General Services, may enter into a cooperative agreement upon the terms and under the conditions as it deems wise, for the purpose of preventing and suppressing forest fires or other fires in any lands within a county, city, or district that makes an appropriation for that purpose.

(b) Within 30 days of the final approval of a new or renewed cooperative agreement, as described in this section, valued at five million dollars ($5,000,000) or more, the department shall submit to the relevant fiscal and policy committees of each house of the Legislature, in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, a copy of the final
 agreement and a brief summary of the agreement for purposes of highlighting information relevant to the Legislature’s fiscal oversight of the agreement. The summary shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The value of the agreement.

(2) The number of positions associated with the agreement.

(3) Whether the agreement is new or a renewal.

(4) Whether the agreement expands upon an existing agreement.

(5) A brief discussion of the manner in which the agreement scored on the department’s evaluation criteria, and the degree to which the agreement aligns with the department’s base mission, as described in Sections 713 and 714.

(6) A brief discussion of any subjective factors that influenced the director’s decision.

(c) When the state assumes personnel from a county, city, or district, an actuarially determined benefit factor shall be included as a cost in the cooperative agreement, including renewals of the agreement, for a county, city, or district that elects to allow the completed years an employee worked at that county, city, or district, or a lesser number of completed years specified by the local agency, to be credited towards the vesting period for state postretirement health benefits. The department shall certify the completed years of county, city, or district service to be credited to an employee to the Board of Administration Public Employees’ Retirement System at the time of separation for retirement. The actuarially determined benefit factor shall be accepted as sufficient by the Department of
 Forestry and Fire Protection, upon review by the Department of Finance, to fully compensate the state for the postretirement health benefit costs of those employees. The postretirement health benefit costs charged under this subdivision may be paid in periodic installments at the discretion of the department. If the costs are paid in installments, the payment of the postretirement health benefit costs for years credited for nonstate service shall be a continuing obligation of a county, city, or district that made that election, regardless of whether or not the cooperative agreement continues or is renewed, and regardless of whether or not the employees continue in state service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 718, Sec. 10.   (SB 855)   Effective October 19, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4142.1.

When a county, city, or district considers entering into a cooperative agreement pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4142 under which the state would assume personnel from the county, city, or district, the county, city or district shall, prior to the execution of the cooperative agreement, give written notice to each affected employee of how the transfer of functions would affect their health benefits upon their retirement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 52.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4143.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the maintenance of the economic well-being of the state and the public health and safety require that the state, through the department, obtain full utilization of all equipment, personnel, and buildings under the jurisdiction of the director. In order to obtain these benefits, the director, in accordance with policy determined by the board, may provide personnel for and operate those fire stations, statewide, as the director deems necessary to provide the best possible fire prevention and suppression. Personnel or equipment shall not be assigned to any location or assigned pursuant to Section 4144 if that assignment would not meet policy and standards established by the board. The policy and standards shall be designed to ensure all of the following:

(a) The striking force and efficiency of the department in its primary mission of wild land fire protection, as well as response to major fires or other natural disasters will not be reduced or impaired.

(b) The department will not need any additional funds to operate its program.

(c) Personnel and equipment assigned pursuant to Section 4144 will not replicate services provided under an agreement made pursuant to Section 4142.

The normal assignment of fire resources of the department throughout California during periods of critical fire weather conditions or during major wild land fires shall not be impaired and shall receive priority over agreements made with counties pursuant to Section 4144.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 408, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

4144.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 4142, the director may, with the approval of the Department of General Services, enter into a cooperative agreement, for the purpose of preventing and suppressing fires, with a city, county, special district, or other political subdivision of the state or person, firm, association, or corporation that requests an agreement, under those terms and conditions that the director deems wise.

(b) The director shall not enter into or renew a cooperative agreement pursuant to this section under any of the following circumstances:

(1) With any county that has assumed responsibility pursuant to Section 4129.

(2) If the land to be protected is not in proximity to, nor within lands classified by the board pursuant to Section 4125 as, a state responsibility area. For the purposes of this paragraph, “proximity” means within a distance from an existing facility that results in a response time established by the board that is not longer than that used by the department in meeting its state wild land fire protection mission.

(3) The director determines that the agreement would significantly reduce existing fire prevention and suppression service levels.

(4) The director determines, pursuant to the policy and standards adopted by the board under Section 4143, that the agreement would replicate services provided under an agreement made pursuant to Section 4142.

(5) The director determines that the service area of a particular station under the agreement is more appropriately served under an agreement made pursuant to Section 4142.

(c) The cooperative agreement shall provide all of the following:

(1) The department shall ensure that a staffing level, mutually agreeable to the parties to the agreement, is maintained on all fire prevention and suppression vehicles.

(2) The personnel, equipment, and buildings utilized shall be limited to those used to protect state responsibility areas. Whenever the cooperative agreement provides for the employment of personnel during the nonfire season who would be in addition to the personnel required for the necessary operation and maintenance of equipment and buildings under the jurisdiction of the director, the full salaries and all benefits of the additional personnel shall be apportioned, as costs to the city, county, special district, or other political subdivision of the state, or person, firm, association, or corporation that contracts with the department pursuant to the cooperative agreement for fire protection.

(3) A cost apportionment between the state and the city, county, special district, or other political subdivision of the state, or person, firm, association, or corporation that contracts with the state for fire protection that reasonably reflects cost apportionments made pursuant to Section 4141 or 4142, except that the contracting city, county, special district, other political subdivision of the state, or contracting person, firm, association, or corporation shall be apportioned the additional cost for extended staff availability for 24-hour emergency response, for state personnel assigned to staff fire engines at a rate determined annually by the director, plus staff benefit costs attributable to the apportionment, and total unplanned overtime pay. The department shall recover its actual additional costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 562.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4145.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that cooperative agreements that are entered into between the department and a local government shall provide for the equitable sharing of costs associated with capital outlay projects that enlarge, enhance, or replace facilities for the purposes of benefiting the cooperating local government.

(b) The department shall prescribe those terms and conditions for those cooperative agreements that would result in an equitable sharing of those costs in proportion to the benefits derived, including any in-kind, lump-sum, or installment payments. Any installment payment made in connection with a cooperative agreement entered into pursuant to this section shall be made over a period of time not exceeding a maximum of 20 years at the same rate of interest as the rate for the state’s Pooled Money Investment Account. Any money that is received for reimbursements for facility improvement costs, under a cooperative agreement, shall be deposited in the General Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 202, Sec. 3.   Effective July 22, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Rapid Disaster Response Act of 2005 [4147. - 4148.]

4147.

This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the Rapid Disaster Response Act of 2005.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 290, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

4148.

The director shall draw upon eligible federal funds to augment any state funds appropriated by the Legislature for the purpose of replacing the department’s aging helicopter fleet.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 290, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Firewardens and Firefighting Personnel [4151. - 4157.]

4151.

(a) The director shall appoint, in a number and localities as the director deems wise, public-spirited citizens to act as voluntary firewardens, who may receive payment for their services from the counties or from private sources. They shall promptly report all fires and take immediate and active steps toward their extinguishment, report any violation of forest fire laws, assist in apprehending and convicting offenders, and perform other duties as the director may direct. A United States Forest Service employee within this state, if the employee accepts the duties and responsibilities of a firewarden, may be appointed a voluntary firewarden, and shall have all the powers given to firewardens by this
 article.

(b) The firewardens do not have authority to obligate the state for the payment of money, unless specifically authorized by the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 53.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4152.

If a fire patrol for the prevention and suppression of forest fires is maintained by owners of land or by any organization, the director may designate each patrol person as a voluntary firewarden and, for the protection of lands patrolled by them or adjacent to those lands, may give them all the rights and powers of a voluntary firewarden. Voluntary firewardens shall be paid by the owners or organizations or as provided for by Section 4151. The firewardens do not have authority to obligate the state for the payment of money, unless specifically authorized by the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 54.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4153.

The department or its duly authorized agent may summon an able-bodied person to assist in suppressing a forest fire and may authorize an officer of the state, who is charged with the prevention and suppression of fire or the enforcement of the state fire laws, to summon an able-bodied person to assist in suppressing a forest fire within their respective jurisdictions. An able-bodied person who is engaged in the harvest of perishable agricultural crops shall not, however, be summoned to assist in suppressing a forest fire until all other available workpower has been exhausted within the respective jurisdiction of the officer issuing the summons. A member in good standing of a regularly organized fire department shall not be summoned if
 the member is available and subject to call for duty with a firefighting unit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 55.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4154.

Any person who fails to obey a summons which is authorized by Section 4153 is guilty of a violation of this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4155.

Every person who in obedience to such summons assists in extinguishing any forest fire shall be compensated at the same wage rate, excluding fringe benefits, as state employees performing like services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 500.)
-------------------------------------------

4156.

(a) The director and employees or classes of employees of the department designated by the director have the powers conferred by law upon peace officers listed in Section 830.2 of the Penal Code, and voluntary firewardens designated by the director have the powers conferred by law upon peace officers listed in Section 830.37 of the Penal Code; provided, however, that the primary duty of the peace officer shall be the enforcement of forest laws and regulations, state and county fire laws and regulations, and the laws relating to explosives as set forth in Part 1 (commencing with Section 12000) of Division 11 of the Health and Safety Code, other than laws the enforcement of which is primarily the
 responsibility of the State Fire Marshal. Officers, employees, and voluntary firewardens, upon request pursuant to Section 8597 of the Government Code, shall have the full powers and duties of peace officers for all purposes as provided by the Penal Code and are not liable to civil action for trespass committed in the discharge of their duties.

(b) A peace officer may enforce federal fire laws to the extent that the peace officer is authorized to do so.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 56.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4157.

When the director or any of the employees or voluntary firewardens who are designated as peace officers pursuant to Section 4156 arrests a person for a violation of this article or for a violation of a law relating to forest or fire protection that is not a felony, the director or any of the employees or voluntary firewardens who are designated as peace officers may immediately release the arrested person from their custody in the manner and under the conditions that are set forth in Section 853.6 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 57.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Violations [4165. - 4170.5.]

4165.

Every person is guilty of a misdemeanor who, at a forest fire, does any of the following:

(a) Disobeys the lawful orders of a public officer or firefighter.

(b) Offers resistance to, or interference with, the lawful efforts of a firefighter or company of firefighters to extinguish the fire.

(c) Engages in any disorderly conduct which is calculated to prevent the fire from being extinguished.

(d) Forbids, prevents, or dissuades others from assisting to extinguish the fire.

(e) Rides, drives, or propels any vehicle or conveyance upon, over, or across any firehose or chemical hose that is used by, or in charge of, a public officer or firefighter or injures or damages in any manner any hose or apparatus of any kind that is in use by, or in charge of, a public officer or firefighter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 58.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4166.

A person who violates this article is guilty of a misdemeanor, which is punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000). If the defendant refuses, on conviction, to pay the fine, the defendant shall be confined in the county jail of the county in which conviction is had for a period not to exceed one day for every five dollars ($5) of the fine imposed, or may be subject to both the fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 59.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4170.

Any uncontrolled fire burning on any lands covered wholly or in part by timber, brush, grass, grain or any other flammable material, without proper precaution being taken to prevent its spread notwithstanding the origin of such fire, is a public nuisance by reason of its menace to life and property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 489.)
-------------------------------------------

4170.5.

The department or any other duly established fire protection agency may summarily abate an uncontrolled fire as a public nuisance by controlling and extinguishing the fire.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Public Nuisances [4171. - 4181.]

4171.

Any condition endangering public safety by creating a fire hazard and which exists upon any property which is included within any state reponsibility area is a public nuisance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4172.

If the director determines that a public nuisance, as defined in Section 4171, exists, the director shall notify the owner of the property to abate the public nuisance. If the owner is unknown, a copy of the notice shall be posted upon the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 60.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4173.

The board shall establish standards, based upon its determination of conditions which create an unreasonable hazard to life or property from fire, for what constitutes a hazardous condition in those instances not covered by state law. Such standards shall be established for each of the department’s administrative districts after public hearing for which ample publicity is given.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

4174.

The notice shall be in writing and shall do all of the following:

(a) Describe the public nuisance.

(b) Specify the time within which the property owner is required to abate the public nuisance.

(c) State that, unless the public nuisance is abated within the time specified in the notice, the department may abate the public nuisance and the costs of the abatement will be assessed against the property.

(d) State that the property owner may, within 15 days after the receipt or posting of the notice, request a hearing before the director upon whether or not a public nuisance actually exists.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

4175.

If a property owner requests a hearing, the director shall fix a time and a place for the hearing and notify the property owner. At the time and place of the hearing, the property owner may appear and be heard upon the question of whether or not a public nuisance actually exists upon property that the property owner owns. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11180) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 61.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4176.

If the director determines, at the conclusion of the hearing, that a public nuisance actually exists upon property owned by the property owner, the director shall order the property owner to abate the public nuisance within a specified time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 62.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4177.

If the public nuisance is not abated within the time specified in the notice to the property owner pursuant to Section 4172 or, if a hearing is not requested by the property owner, within the time specified in the order made by the director pursuant to Section 4176, the department may abate the public nuisance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

4178.

Any costs which are incurred by the department in abating any public nuisance pursuant to this article are a lien upon the property upon which the public nuisance existed when notice of the lien is filed and recorded as provided in Section 4179.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

4179.

Notice of the lien, particularly identifying the property on which the nuisance was abated and the amount of such lien, and naming the owner of record of such property, shall be recorded by the department in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the property is situated within one year after the first item of expenditures by the department or within 90 days after the completion of the work, whichever first occurs. Upon such recordation of the notice of lien, the lien shall have the same force, effect, and priority as a judgment lien, except that it shall attach only to the property described in such notice, and shall continue for 10 years from the time of recording of such notice unless sooner released or otherwise discharged.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

4179.5.

The Attorney General may at any time release all or any portion of the property subject to a lien imposed pursuant to Sections 4178 and 4179 from the lien or subordinate the lien to other liens and encumbrances if the Attorney General determines that the amount owed is sufficiently secured by a lien on other property or that the release or subordination of the lien will not jeopardize the collection of the amount owed. A certificate by the Attorney General to the effect that any property has been released from the lien or that the lien has been subordinated to other liens and encumbrances shall be conclusive evidence that the property has been released or that the lien has been subordinated as provided in the
 certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 63.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4180.

An action to foreclose the lien shall be commenced by the Attorney General in the name of the people of the State of California within six months after the lien is filed and recorded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4181.

When the property is sold, enough of the proceeds to satisfy the lien and the costs of the foreclosure shall be paid to the state. The surplus, if any, shall be paid to the owner of the property, if known, or if the property owner is not known, shall be paid into the court in which the lien was foreclosed for the use of the owner when the property owner is ascertained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 64.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Clarke-McNary Act [4185. - 4187.]

4185.

The State of California hereby accepts the provisions of the Clarke-McNary Act (Ch. 348, 43 Stat. 653), as amended, passed by the Congress of the United States, and entitled “An act to provide for the protection of forest lands, for the reforestation of denuded areas, for the extension of national forests, and for other purposes, in order to promote the continuous production of timber on lands chiefly suitable therefor,” and will observe and comply with the requirements of that act of Congress.

The department is the agent of this state for the purposes of the Clarke-McNary Act. The department shall have full power to cooperate with
 all the authorities of the United States which have powers and duties under the act to do and perform all things necessary to secure to this state the benefits of the act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

4186.
